Washington statutes.
RCW 15.62.170

Recordkeeping.

(1) Each apiarist and broker shall keep accurate records of the number of colonies owned or operated during each calendar year.

(2) Each manufacturer shall keep accurate records of gross sales of industry products or manufactured goods sold in the state of Washington.

(3) Each processor shall keep accurate records of the pounds of honey sold in the state of Washington.

(4) Each first-handler shall keep accurate records of the industry products sold in the state of Washington.

(5) The records shall contain information required by the commission and shall be preserved for a period of five years.

(6) The records shall be made available for audit upon request of the commission or its agent, as authorized in RCW 15.62.040 and 15.62.200.

[ 1989 c 5 s 17.]